Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 279A.128 is amended to read:
279A.128. (1) As used in this section, “services” means services as defined in  ORS 279A.010
(1)(kk) and personal services designated under ORS 279A.055.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding provisions of law requiring  a contracting agency to award a contract to
the lowest responsible bidder  or best proposer or provider of a quotation, a contracting agency that
uses public funds to procure goods or services for a public use under ORS chapter  279B may give
preference to:
(A) Procuring  goods or services [ provided by ] from one of the following sources, if the goods
or services cost not more than  five percent more than goods or services available from
contractors other than the source:
(i) A benefit company  that is incorporated, organized, formed or created under ORS 60.754, that
submits with a bid or proposal a certificate of existence issued under ORS 60.027 and  has the ma-
jority of the  benefit company’s regular, full-time workforce located in this state at the time the
benefit company submits the bid or proposal[ , if the goods or services cost not  more than five percent
more than goods or services available from a contractor that is not a benefit company ]; or
(ii) An entity in  which the entity’s employees own at least 50 percent of the ownership
interest in the entity directly or through an employee stock ownership plan,  as defined in
26 U.S.C. 4975(e)(7), as in effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act,  that the United States
Internal Revenue Service recognizes as a qualified plan; or
(B) Procuring goods that are fabricated or processed, or services that  are performed, entirely
within this state if the goods  or services cost not more than 10 percent more than goods that are
not fabricated or processed, or services that are not performed, entirely within this state.
(b) If more than one bidder or proposer qualifies for a  preference described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the contracting agency may give a further preference to  a qualifying bidder or
proposer that resides in or is headquartered in this state.
(c) A contracting agency may give a preference to an entity described  in paragraph
(a)(A)(ii) of this subsection only  if the entity submits with a bid or proposal for a public
contract evidence that shows that employees of the entity  own at least 50 percent of the
entity’s ownership interest directly or through an employee stock ownership plan.
Enrolled House Bill 3646 (HB 3646-INTRO) Page 1
[(c)] (d) The contracting agency by order may set a higher  cost  percentage than the  cost  per-
centages set forth in paragraph (a) of  this subsection if the contracting agency, in a written deter-
mination to support the order, finds  good cause to set the higher  cost  percentage and explains the
contracting agency’s reasons and evidence for the finding.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 279C.320 (1), subsection (2) of this section  does not apply to emergency
work, minor alterations, ordinary repairs or maintenance work for public improvements or to other
construction contracts described in ORS 279C.320 (1).
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 279A.128 by  section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to
procurements that a contracting agency advertises or  solicits or, if the contracting agency
does not advertise or  solicit the procurement, to a public contract into which the contracting
agency enters on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to ORS 279A.128 by section  1 of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Attorney General, the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative
Services, the Director of Transportation  and a contracting agency that adopts rules under
ORS 279A.065 or 279A.070 may take  any action before the operative date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the Attorney General, the  directors or
the contracting agency to undertake and exercise, on and after the operative date specified
in subsection  (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the
Attorney General, the directors or the contracting agency by  the amendments to ORS
279A.128 by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3646 (HB 3646-INTRO) Page 2